Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-17,103
Transfer to regular reserve account.

(1) Immediately before the payment of each dividend, the gross earnings of the credit union shall be determined. From this amount there shall be set aside as a regular reserve account for contingencies an amount as set forth in 12 C.F.R. 702.

(2) The director may at any time require the credit union to increase the amount set aside in a regular reserve account pursuant to subsection (1) of this section or to establish a special reserve account if, in the judgment of the director, the financial condition of the credit union warrants such action.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 103;

Laws 2001, LB 53, § 25.